Florida, session 2026, HB507.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (7) is added to section 92.55,
Florida Statutes, to read:
92.55 Special protections in proceedings involving victim
or witness under 18, person with intellectual disability, or
sexual offense victim.—
(7) Upon motion of any party, upon motion of a parent,
guardian, attorney, guardian ad litem, or other advocate
appointed by the court under s. 914.17 for a victim or witness
under the age of 18, a person who has an intellectual
disability, or a sexual offense victim or witness, or upon its
own motion, the court may require a pro se defendant to present,
ask, or in any way communicate questions to such person, victim,
or witness through standby counsel, using questions provided or
approved by the defendant, at any trial, hearing, or deposition
if the court makes specific findings on the record that such a
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb507-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 507 2026
requirement is necessary to protect the person, victim, or
witness from emotional or mental harm that would result from
direct communication with the defendant.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb507-01-c1